Illinois, session 104th, HB4843.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 5changing Sections 3-109, 3-412, 3-609, 3-701, 3-705, 3-801, 64-105, 5-202, 5-701, 6-115, 6-118, 11-1301.2, and 12-610.2 as 7follows: 8    (625 ILCS 5/3-109)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 3-109)9    Sec. 3-109. Registration without certificate of title; 10bond. If the Secretary of State is not satisfied as to the 11ownership of the vehicle, including, but not limited to, in 12the case of a manufactured home, a circumstance in which the 13manufactured home is covered by a Manufacturer's Statement of 14Origin that the owner of the manufactured home, after diligent 15search and inquiry, is unable to produce, or that there are no 16undisclosed security interests in it, the Secretary of State 17may register the vehicle but shall:18        (a) Withhold issuance of a certificate of title until 19    the applicant presents documents reasonably sufficient to 20    satisfy the Secretary of State as to the applicant's 21    ownership of the vehicle and that there are no undisclosed 22    security interests in it;23        (b) As a condition of issuing a certificate of title,   HB4843 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 20543 LNS 34020 b1    require the applicant to file with the Secretary of State 2    a bond in the form prescribed by the Secretary of State and 3    executed by the applicant, and either accompanied by the 4    deposit of cash with the Secretary of State or also 5    executed by a person authorized to conduct a surety 6    business in this State. The bond shall be in an amount 7    equal to one and one-half times the value of the vehicle as 8    determined by the Secretary of State and conditioned to 9    indemnify any prior owner and lienholder and any 10    subsequent purchaser of the vehicle or person acquiring 11    any security interest in it, and their respective 12    successors in interest, against any expense, loss or 13    damage, including reasonable attorney's fees, by reason of 14    the issuance of the certificate of title of the vehicle or 15    on account of any defect in or undisclosed security 16    interest upon the right, title and interest of the 17    applicant in and to the vehicle. Any such interested 18    person has a right of action to recover on the bond for any 19    breach of its conditions, but the aggregate liability of 20    the surety to all persons shall not exceed the amount of 21    the bond. The bond, and any deposit accompanying it, shall 22    be returned at the end of 3 years or prior thereto if (i) 23    the vehicle is no longer registered in this State and the 24    currently valid certificate of title is surrendered to the 25    Secretary of State or (ii) in the case of a certificate of 26    title to a manufactured home, the currently valid   HB4843 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 20543 LNS 34020 b1    certificate of title is surrendered to the Secretary of 2    State in accordance with Section 3-116.2; unless the 3    Secretary of State has been notified of the pendency of an 4    action to recover on the bond. Security deposited as a 5    bond hereunder shall be placed by the Secretary of State 6    in the custody of the State Treasurer; or7        (b-5) Require the applicant to file with the Secretary 8    of State an application for a provisional title in the 9    form prescribed by the Secretary and executed by the 10    applicant, and accompanied by a $50 fee to be deposited in 11    the CDLIS/AAMVAnet/NMVTIS Trust Fund. The Secretary shall 12    designate by rule the documentation acceptable for an 13    individual to apply for a provisional title. A provisional 14    title shall be valid for 3 years and is nontransferable 15    for the 3-year period. A provisional title shall be 16    clearly marked and otherwise distinguished from a 17    certificate of title. Three years after the issuance of a 18    provisional title, the provisional title holder shall 19    apply for the appropriate transferable transferrable title 20    in the applicant's name. If a claim of ownership for the 21    vehicle is brought against a holder of a provisional 22    title, then the provisional title holder shall apply for a 23    bond under subsection (b) of this Section for the amount 24    of time remaining on the provisional title. A provisional 25    title holder or an individual who asserts a claim to the 26    motor vehicle may petition a circuit court of competent   HB4843 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 20543 LNS 34020 b1    jurisdiction for an order to determine the ownership of 2    the vehicle. A provisional title shall not be available to 3    individuals or entities that rebuild, repair, store, or 4    tow vehicles or have a claim against the vehicle under the 5    Labor and Storage Lien Act or the Labor and Storage Lien 6    (Small Amount) Act. 7        Security deposited as a bond hereunder shall be placed 8    by the Secretary of State in the custody of the State 9    Treasurer.10    During July, annually, the Secretary shall compile a list 11of all bonds on deposit, pursuant to this Section, for more 12than 3 years and concerning which he has received no notice as 13to the pendency of any judicial proceeding that could affect 14the disposition thereof. Thereupon, he shall promptly send a 15notice by certified mail to the last known address of each 16depositor advising him that his bond will be subject to 17escheat to the State of Illinois if not claimed within 30 days 18after the mailing date of such notice. At the expiration of 19such time, the Secretary of State shall file with the State 20Treasurer an order directing the transfer of such deposit to 21the Road Fund in the State Treasury. Upon receipt of such 22order, the State Treasurer shall make such transfer, after 23converting to cash any other type of security. Thereafter any 24person having a legal claim against such deposit may enforce 25it by appropriate proceedings in the Court of Claims subject 26to the limitations prescribed for such Court. At the   HB4843 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 20543 LNS 34020 b1expiration of such limitation period such deposit shall 2escheat to the State of Illinois.3(Source: P.A. 98-749, eff. 7-16-14; 98-777, eff. 1-1-15; 499-78, eff. 7-20-15.) 5    (625 ILCS 5/3-412)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 3-412)6    Sec. 3-412. Registration plates or digital registration 7plates and registration stickers or digital registration 8stickers to be furnished by the Secretary of State.9    (a) The Secretary of State upon registering a vehicle 10subject to annual registration for the first time shall issue 11or shall cause to be issued to the owner one registration plate 12or digital registration plate for a motorcycle, trailer, 13semitrailer, moped, autocycle, or truck-tractor, 2 14registration plates, or a digital registration plate and metal 15plate as set forth in Section 3-401.5, for other motor 16vehicles and, where applicable, current registration stickers 17or digital registration stickers for motor vehicles of the 18first division. The provisions of this Section may be made 19applicable to such vehicles of the second division, as the 20Secretary of State may, from time to time, in his discretion 21designate. On subsequent annual registrations during the term 22of the registration plate or digital registration plate as 23provided in Section 3-414.1, the Secretary shall issue or 24cause to be issued registration stickers or digital 25registration stickers as evidence of current registration.   HB4843 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 20543 LNS 34020 b1However, the issuance of annual registration stickers or 2digital registration stickers to vehicles registered under the 3provisions of Sections 3-402.1 and 3-405.3 of this Code may 4not be required if the Secretary deems the issuance 5unnecessary.6    (b) Except as otherwise provided in this Code, the design 7and color of registration plates shall be wholly within the 8discretion of the Secretary of State. Every registration plate 9or digital registration plate shall have displayed upon it the 10registration number assigned to the vehicle for which it is 11issued, the name of this State, which may be abbreviated, the 12year number for which it was issued, which may be abbreviated, 13the phrase "Land of Lincoln" (except as otherwise provided in 14this Code), and such other letters or numbers as the Secretary 15may prescribe. However, for apportionment plates issued to 16vehicles registered under Section 3-402.1 and fleet plates 17issued to vehicles registered under Section 3-405.3, the 18phrase "Land of Lincoln" may be omitted to allow for the word 19"apportioned", the word "fleet", or other similar language to 20be displayed. Registration plates or digital registration 21plates issued to a vehicle registered as a fleet vehicle may 22display a designation determined by the Secretary.23    The Secretary may in his discretion prescribe that letters 24be used as prefixes only on registration plates or digital 25registration plates issued to vehicles of the first division 26which are registered under this Code and only as suffixes on   HB4843 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 20543 LNS 34020 b1registration plates or digital registration plates issued to 2other vehicles. Every registration sticker or digital 3registration sticker issued as evidence of current 4registration shall designate the year number for which it is 5issued and such other letters or numbers as the Secretary may 6prescribe and shall be of a contrasting color with the 7registration plates or digital registration plates and 8registration stickers or digital registration stickers of the 9previous year.10    (c) Each registration plate or digital registration plate 11and the required letters and numerals thereon, except the year 12number for which issued, shall be of sufficient size to be 13plainly readable from a distance of 100 feet during daylight, 14and shall be coated with reflectorizing material. The 15dimensions of the plate issued to vehicles of the first 16division shall be 6 by 12 inches.17    (d) The Secretary of State shall issue for every passenger 18motor vehicle rented without a driver the same type of 19registration plates or digital registration plates as the type 20of plates issued for a private passenger vehicle.21    (e) The Secretary of State shall issue for every passenger 22car used as a taxicab or livery, distinctive registration 23plates or digital registration plates.24    (f) The Secretary of State shall issue for every 25motorcycle distinctive registration plates or digital 26registration plates distinguishing between motorcycles having   HB4843 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 20543 LNS 34020 b1150 or more cubic centimeters piston displacement, or having 2less than 150 cubic centimeter piston displacement.3    (g) Registration plates or digital registration plates 4issued to vehicles for-hire may display a designation as 5determined by the Secretary that such vehicles are for-hire.6    (h) (Blank).7    (i) The Secretary of State shall issue for every public 8and private ambulance registration plates or digital 9registration plates identifying the vehicle as an ambulance. 10The Secretary shall forward to the Department of Healthcare 11and Family Services registration information for the purpose 12of verification of claims filed with the Department by 13ambulance owners for payment for services to public assistance 14recipients.15    (j) The Secretary of State shall issue for every public 16and private medical carrier or rescue vehicle livery 17registration plates or digital registration plates displaying 18numbers within ranges of numbers reserved respectively for 19medical carriers and rescue vehicles. The Secretary shall 20forward to the Department of Healthcare and Family Services 21registration information for the purpose of verification of 22claims filed with the Department by owners of medical carriers 23or rescue vehicles for payment for services to public 24assistance recipients.25    (k) The Secretary of State shall issue distinctive license 26plates or digital registration plates or distinctive license   HB4843 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 20543 LNS 34020 b1plate stickers or digital registration stickers for every 2vehicle exempted from subsections (a) and (a-5) of Section 312-503 by subsection (g) of that Section, and by subsection 4(g-5) of that Section before its deletion by this amendatory 5Act of the 95th General Assembly. The Secretary shall issue 6these plates or stickers immediately upon receiving the 7physician's certification required under subsection (g) of 8Section 12-503. New plates or stickers shall also be issued 9when the certification is renewed as provided in that 10subsection. 11    (l) The Secretary of State shall issue distinctive 12registration plates or digital registration plates for 13low-speed vehicles. 14    (m) The Secretary of State shall issue distinctive 15registration plates or digital registration plates for 16autocycles. The dimensions of the plate issued to autocycles 17shall be 4 by 7 inches. 18(Source: P.A. 101-395, eff. 8-16-19.) 19    (625 ILCS 5/3-609)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 3-609)20    Sec. 3-609. Plates for veterans with disabilities. 21    (a) Any veteran who holds proof of a service-connected 22disability from the United States Department of Veterans 23Affairs, and who has obtained certification from a licensed 24physician, physician assistant, or advanced practice 25registered nurse that the service-connected disability   HB4843 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 20543 LNS 34020 b1qualifies the veteran for issuance of registration plates or 2digital registration plates or decals to a person with 3disabilities in accordance with Section 3-616, may, without 4the payment of any registration fee, make application to the 5Secretary of State for license plates for veterans with 6disabilities displaying the international symbol of access, 7for the registration of one motor vehicle of the first 8division, one motorcycle, or one motor vehicle of the second 9division weighing not more than 8,000 pounds.10    (b) Any veteran who holds proof of a service-connected 11disability from the United States Department of Veterans 12Affairs, and whose degree of disability has been declared to 13be 50% or more, but whose disability does not qualify the 14veteran for a plate or decal for persons with disabilities 15under Section 3-616, may, without the payment of any 16registration fee, make application to the Secretary for a 17special registration plate or digital registration plate 18without the international symbol of access for the 19registration of one motor vehicle of the first division, one 20motorcycle, or one motor vehicle of the second division 21weighing not more than 8,000 pounds.22    (c) Renewal of such registration must be accompanied with 23documentation for eligibility of registration without fee 24unless the applicant has a permanent qualifying disability, 25and such registration plates or digital registration plates 26may not be issued to any person not eligible therefor. The   HB4843 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 20543 LNS 34020 b1Illinois Department of Veterans Affairs may assist in 2providing the documentation of disability.3    (d) The design and color of the plates shall be within the 4discretion of the Secretary, except that the plates issued 5under subsection (b) of this Section shall not contain the 6international symbol of access. The Secretary may, in his or 7her discretion, allow the plates to be issued as vanity or 8personalized plates in accordance with Section 3-405.1 of this 9Code. Registration shall be for a multi-year period and may be 10issued staggered registration. 11    (e) Any person eligible to receive license plates under 12this Section who has been approved for benefits under the 13Senior Citizens and Persons with Disabilities Property Tax 14Relief Act, or who has claimed and received a grant under that 15Act, shall pay the a fee specified under Section 3-806.3 of $24 16instead of the fee otherwise provided in this Code for 17passenger cars displaying standard multi-year registration 18plates or digital registration plates issued under Section 193-414.1, for motor vehicles registered at 8,000 pounds or less 20under Section 3-815(a), or for recreational vehicles 21registered at 8,000 pounds or less under Section 3-815(b), for 22a second set of plates under this Section. 23    (f) With respect to the supporting documentation required 24to obtain a plate under this Section, the Secretary shall 25allow an applicant to redact information on the documentation 26that pertains to the nature of the applicant's health issue,   HB4843 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 20543 LNS 34020 b1unless that information is necessary to confirm that the 2applicant's disability is service-connected or to establish 3the degree of the applicant's service-connected disability. 4(Source: P.A. 104-234, eff. 8-15-25.) 5    (625 ILCS 5/3-701)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 3-701)6    Sec. 3-701. Operation of vehicles without evidence of 7registration - Operation under mileage plates when odometer 8broken or disconnected. 9    (a) No person shall operate, nor shall an owner knowingly 10permit to be operated, except as provided in subsection (b) of 11this Section, a vehicle upon any highway unless there shall be 12attached thereto and displayed thereon when and as required by 13law, proper evidence of registration in Illinois, as follows:14        (1) A vehicle required to be registered in Illinois. A 15    current and valid Illinois registration sticker or 16    stickers and plate or plates or digital registration 17    sticker or stickers and digital plate or plates, or an 18    Illinois temporary registration permit, or a drive-away or 19    in-transit permit, issued therefor by the Secretary of 20    State.21        (2) A vehicle eligible for Reciprocity. A current and 22    valid reciprocal foreign registration plate or digital 23    registration plate or plates properly issued to such 24    vehicle or a temporary registration issued therefor, by 25    the reciprocal State, and, in addition, when required by   HB4843 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 20543 LNS 34020 b1    the Secretary, a current and valid Illinois Reciprocity 2    Permit or Prorate Decal issued therefor by the Secretary 3    of State; or except as otherwise expressly provided for in 4    this Chapter.5        (3) A vehicle commuting for repairs in Illinois. A 6    dealer plate issued by a foreign state shall exempt a 7    vehicle from the requirements of this Section if the 8    vehicle is being operated for the purpose of transport to 9    a repair facility in Illinois to have repairs performed on 10    the vehicle displaying foreign dealer plates. The driver 11    of the motor vehicle bearing dealer plates shall provide a 12    work order or contract with the repair facility to a law 13    enforcement officer upon request. 14    (b) A person may operate, or permit the operation of, a 15vehicle upon any highway a vehicle that has been properly 16registered but does not display a current and valid Illinois 17registration sticker or digital registration sticker if he or 18she has proof, in the form of a printed receipt from the 19Secretary, that he or she registered the vehicle but has not 20received a new registration sticker or digital registration 21sticker from the Secretary. This printed proof of registration 22is valid for 30 days from the expiration of the previous 23registration sticker's or digital registration sticker's date 24or 30 days from the purchase date of the new registration 25sticker or digital registration sticker, whichever occurs 26later.   HB4843 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 20543 LNS 34020 b1    (c) No person shall operate, nor shall any owner knowingly 2permit to be operated, any vehicle of the second division for 3which the owner has made an election to pay the mileage tax in 4lieu of the annual flat weight tax, at any time when the 5odometer of such vehicle is broken or disconnected, or is 6inoperable or not operating.7(Source: P.A. 104-105, eff. 8-1-25.) 8    (625 ILCS 5/3-705)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 3-705)9    Sec. 3-705. Suspending or revoking certificate or special 10plates of a manufacturer, engine and driveline component 11manufacturer, transporter, repossessor, tow truck or wrecker 12operator, or dealer.13    The Secretary of State is also authorized to suspend or 14revoke a certificate or the special plates issued to a 15manufacturer, engine and driveline component manufacturer, 16transporter, repossessor, tow truck or wrecker operator, or 17dealer upon determining that any such person is not lawfully 18entitled thereto or has made or knowingly permitted any 19illegal use of such plates or has committed fraud in the 20registration of vehicles or failed to give notices of 21transfers when and as required by this Chapter.22(Source: P.A. 76-2139.) 23    (625 ILCS 5/3-801)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 3-801)24    Sec. 3-801. Registration.   HB4843 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 20543 LNS 34020 b1    (a) Except as provided herein for new residents, every 2owner of any vehicle which shall be operated upon the public 3highways of this State shall, within 24 hours after becoming 4the owner or at such time as such vehicle becomes subject to 5registration under the provisions of this Act, file in an 6office of the Secretary of State, an application for 7registration properly completed and executed. New residents 8need not secure registration until 30 days after establishing 9residency in this State, provided the vehicle is properly 10registered in another jurisdiction. By the expiration of such 1130-day statutory grace period, a new resident shall comply 12with the provisions of this Act and apply for Illinois vehicle 13registration. All applications for registration shall be 14accompanied by all documentation required under the provisions 15of this Act. The appropriate registration fees and taxes 16provided for in this Article of this Chapter shall be paid to 17the Secretary of State with the application for registration 18of vehicles subject to registration under this Act.19    (b) Any resident of this State, who has been serving as a 20member or as a civilian employee of the United States Armed 21Services, or as a civilian employee of the United States 22Department of Defense, outside of the State of Illinois, need 23not secure registration until 45 days after returning to this 24State, provided the vehicle displays temporary military 25registration.26    (c) When an application is submitted by mail, the   HB4843 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 20543 LNS 34020 b1applicant may not submit cash or postage stamps for payment of 2fees or taxes due. The Secretary in his discretion, may 3decline to accept a personal or company check or electronic 4payment in payment of fees or taxes. An application submitted 5to a dealer, or a remittance made to the Secretary of State 6shall be deemed in compliance with this Section.7    (d) For purposes of registration under this Code, no 8vehicle shall be registered in the name of a person who is not 9an owner or lessee of that vehicle. Any vehicle owner seeking 10to register a vehicle in this State must register that vehicle 11to a State address. This subsection is declarative of existing 12law and practice. 13(Source: P.A. 99-118, eff. 1-1-16; 99-324, eff. 1-1-16; 1499-642, eff. 7-28-16.) 15    (625 ILCS 5/4-105)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 4-105)16    Sec. 4-105. Offenses relating to disposition of titles and 17registration. 18    (a) It is a violation of this Chapter for:19        1. a person to alter, forge, or counterfeit any 20    manufacturer's statement of origin, certificate of title, 21    salvage certificate, junking certificate, license plate or 22    digital license plate, display certificate, registration 23    sticker or digital registration sticker, registration 24    card, or temporary registration permit;25        2. a person to alter, forge, or counterfeit an   HB4843 Enrolled- 17 -LRB104 20543 LNS 34020 b1    assignment of any manufacturer's statement of origin, 2    certificate of title, salvage certificate or junking 3    certificate;4        3. a person to alter, forge, or counterfeit a release 5    of a security interest on any manufacturer's statement of 6    origin, certificate of title, salvage certificate or 7    junking certificate;8        4. a person to alter, forge, or counterfeit an 9    application for any certificate of title, salvage 10    certificate, junking certificate, display certificate, 11    registration sticker or digital registration sticker, 12    registration card, temporary registration permit or 13    license plate;14        5. a person to use a false or fictitious name or 15    address or altered, forged, counterfeited or stolen 16    manufacturer's identification number, or make a material 17    false statement, or fail to disclose a security interest, 18    or conceal any other material fact on any application for 19    any manufacturer's statement of origin, certificate of 20    title, junking certificate, salvage certificate, 21    registration card, license plate or digital license plate, 22    temporary registration permit, or registration sticker or 23    digital registration sticker, or commit a fraud in 24    connection with any application under this Act;25        6. an unauthorized person to have in his possession a 26    blank Illinois certificate of title paper;  HB4843 Enrolled- 18 -LRB104 20543 LNS 34020 b1        7. a person to surrender or cause to be surrendered 2    any certificate of title, salvage or junking certificate 3    in exchange for a certificate of title or other title 4    document from any other state or foreign jurisdiction for 5    the purpose of changing or deleting an "S.V." or "REBUILT" 6    notation, odometer reading, or any other information 7    contained on such Illinois certificate.8    (b) Sentence. A person convicted of a violation of this 9Section shall be guilty of a Class 2 felony. 10(Source: P.A. 101-395, eff. 8-16-19; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21.) 11    (625 ILCS 5/5-202)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 5-202)12    Sec. 5-202. Tow or Wrecker operators must register tow or 13wrecker vehicles. 14    (a) No person in this State shall engage in the business of 15operating a tow truck or wrecker or operate a tow or wrecker 16vehicle until such person shall register any vehicle to be 17used for such purpose and apply for and receive from the 18Secretary of State a generally distinctive set of 3 "tow 19truck" plates for any towing or wrecker vehicle operated by 20him.21    (b) An application for registration for a generally 22distinctive set of 3 "tow truck" plates under this Article 23shall be filed with the Secretary of State, duly verified by 24oath and in such form as the Secretary of State may by rule or 25regulation prescribe and shall contain the name and business   HB4843 Enrolled- 19 -LRB104 20543 LNS 34020 b1address of such person, the vehicle identification number of 2the vehicle for which such application is made, proof of 3insurance as set forth in paragraph (d) of Section 12-606 of 4this Code, and such other information concerning the business 5of the applicant as the Secretary of State may by rule or 6regulation prescribe.7    (c) The application for registration and a generally 8distinctive set of 3 "tow truck" plates shall be accompanied 9by the prescribed fee. Upon payment of such fee, such 10registration and application shall be filed and recorded in 11the office of the Secretary of State. Thereupon the Secretary 12of State shall assign and issue to such person a generally 13distinctive number for each vehicle and without further 14expense to him shall deliver to such person at his place of 15business address one set of 3 "tow truck" plates. Such "tow 16truck" plates shall be used by such person only on the vehicle 17for which application was made and the vehicle being towed, 18and are not transferable.19    (d) All "tow truck" plates granted under this Section 20shall expire by operation of law on December 31 of the calendar 21year for which they are granted unless sooner suspended or 22revoked under the provisions of Section 5-501 of this Chapter 23or Article VII of Chapter 3 of this Code.24    (e) One "tow truck" plate shall be attached to the front 25and rear of each registered vehicle, and one "tow truck" plate 26shall be attached to the rear of the vehicle being towed unless   HB4843 Enrolled- 20 -LRB104 20543 LNS 34020 b1the towed vehicle displays a valid registration plate or 2digital registration plate visible from the rear while being 3towed, so that the numbers and letter on the plate are clearly 4visible to any person following the vehicle being towed. 5However, illumination of the rear plate required by subsection 6(c) of Section 12-201 of this Code shall not apply to the third 7plate displayed on the towed vehicle. In addition, the vehicle 8registration plates or digital registration plates assigned to 9the vehicle being towed shall be displayed as provided in 10Section 3-413 of this Code.11(Source: P.A. 101-395, eff. 8-16-19.) 12    (625 ILCS 5/5-701)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 5-701)13    Sec. 5-701. Vehicle auctioneers to be licensed. 14    (a) No person, other than a licensed new vehicle dealer, a 15licensed used vehicle dealer, or municipality, shall engage in 16this State in the business of auctioning vehicles, for more 17than one owner, at auction or shall offer to sell, solicit or 18advertise the sale of a vehicle at auction without first 19acquiring a commercial vehicle auctioneer license from the 20Secretary of State under the provisions of this Section. A 21vehicle auction licensee shall be entitled thereunder to sell, 22solicit, and advertise the sale of used vehicles belonging to 23others at auction.24    (b) An application for a vehicle auctioneer license shall 25be filed with the Secretary of State, duly verified by oath, in   HB4843 Enrolled- 21 -LRB104 20543 LNS 34020 b1such form as the Secretary of State may by rule or regulation 2prescribe and shall contain:3    1. The name and type of business organization established 4and the address of the place of business;5    2. If the applicant is a corporation, a list of its 6officers and directors, setting forth the residence address of 7each; if the applicant is a sole proprietorship, a 8partnership, an unincorporated association, trust or any 9similar form of business organization, the names and residence 10addresses of the proprietor or of each partner, member, 11officer, director, trustee, manager and shareholder having 10% 12or greater ownership interest in the corporation;13    3. A statement that the applicant has been approved for 14registration under the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act, approved 15June 28, 1933, as amended, by the Department of Revenue. 16However, this requirement does not apply to licensee who is 17already licensed hereunder with the Secretary of State, and 18who is merely applying for a renewal of his license. As 19evidence of this fact, the application shall be accompanied by 20a certification from the Department of Revenue showing that 21the Department has approved the applicant for registration 22under the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act;23    4. A statement that the applicant has complied with the 24bonding requirements of the "Retailers' Occupation Tax Act", 25approved June 28, 1933, as amended. As evidence of this fact, 26the application shall be accompanied by a certification from   HB4843 Enrolled- 22 -LRB104 20543 LNS 34020 b1the Department of Revenue showing that the applicant is in 2compliance with the bonding requirements of the "Retailers' 3Occupation Tax Act" or that the applicant is not required to be 4bonded with the Department of Revenue under the "Retailers' 5Occupation Tax Act";6    5. Such other information concerning the business of the 7applicant as the Secretary of State may by rule or regulation 8prescribe;9    6. An application for a vehicle auctioneer license shall 10be accompanied by the following license fees: $50 for 11applicant's place of business plus $25 for each additional 12place of business, if any, to which the application pertains, 13provided, however, that if such an application is made after 14July 1 of any year, the license fee shall be $25 for 15applicant's place of business plus $12.50 for each additional 16place of business, if any, to which the application pertains. 17License fees shall be returnable only in the event that such 18application shall be denied by the Secretary of State.19    7. A statement that the licensee has irrevocably consented 20to the appointment of the Secretary of State as its agent for 21service of process with the State of Illinois. Said service of 22process shall be accomplished as provided in Section 10-301 of 23the Illinois Vehicle Code.24    (c) Any change which renders no longer accurate any 25information contained in any application for a vehicle 26auctioneer shall be amended within thirty days after the   HB4843 Enrolled- 23 -LRB104 20543 LNS 34020 b1occurrence of each change on such form as the Secretary of 2State may prescribe by rule or regulation, accompanied by an 3amendatory fee of $2.4    (d) Anything in this Chapter to the contrary 5notwithstanding, no person shall be licensed as a vehicle 6auctioneer unless such person shall maintain a place of 7business as defined in this Chapter.8    (e) The Secretary of State shall, within a reasonable time 9after receipt, examine an application submitted to him under 10this Section. Unless the Secretary makes a determination that 11the application submitted to him does not conform to this 12Section or that grounds exist for a denial of the application 13under Section 5-501 of this Chapter, he must grant the 14applicant an original vehicle auctioneer license in writing 15for his place of business and a supplemental license in 16writing for each additional place of business, in such form as 17he may prescribe by rule or regulation which shall include the 18following:19    1. The name of the person licensed;20    2. If a corporation, the name and address of its officers 21or if a sole proprietorship, a partnership, an unincorporated 22association or any similar form of business organization, the 23name and address of the proprietor or of each partner, member, 24officer, director, trustee or manager;25    3. Complete address of the place of business of the 26licensee;  HB4843 Enrolled- 24 -LRB104 20543 LNS 34020 b1    4. In the case of supplemental license, the place of 2business of the licensee and the place of business to which 3such supplemental license pertains.4    (f) The appropriate instruments evidencing the license or 5a certified copy thereof, provided by the Secretary of State 6shall be kept posted, conspicuously, in the place of business 7of the licensee within the State and in each additional place 8of business, if any, maintained by such licensee.9    (g) Except as provided in subsection (h) of this Section, 10all vehicle auctioneer licenses granted under this Section 11expire on December 31 of the calendar year for which they are 12granted unless sooner revoked under Section 5-501 of this 13Chapter.14    (h) a vehicle auctioneer license may be renewed upon 15application and payment of the fee required herein, and 16submission of proof of coverage by an approved bond under the 17"Retailers' Occupation Tax Act" or proof that applicant is not 18subject to such bonding requirements, as in the case of an 19original license, but in case an application for the renewal 20of an effective license is made during the month of December, 21the effective license shall remain in force until the 22application for renewal is granted or denied by the Secretary 23of State.24    (i) Each person licensed as a vehicle auctioneer or a 25licensed new or used car dealer when auctioning vehicles is 26required to furnish each purchaser of a motor vehicle the   HB4843 Enrolled- 25 -LRB104 20543 LNS 34020 b1following:2    1. A certificate of title properly assigned to the 3purchaser. If no assignable title is available, the dealer 4must apply for Illinois title for the purpose of assigning 5title pursuant to this Section;6    2. A statement verified under oath that all identifying 7numbers on the vehicle agree with those on the certificate of 8title;9    3. A bill of sale properly executed on behalf of such 10person.11(Source: P.A. 85-1396.) 12    (625 ILCS 5/6-115)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 6-115)13    Sec. 6-115. Expiration of driver's license. 14    (a) Except as provided elsewhere in this Section, every 15driver's license issued under the provisions of this Code 16shall expire 4 years from the date of its issuance, or at such 17later date, as the Secretary of State may by proper rule and 18regulation designate, not to exceed 12 calendar months; in the 19event that an applicant for renewal of a driver's license 20fails to apply prior to the expiration date of the previous 21driver's license, the renewal driver's license shall expire 4 22years from the expiration date of the previous driver's 23license, or at such later date as the Secretary of State may by 24proper rule and regulation designate, not to exceed 12 25calendar months.  HB4843 Enrolled- 26 -LRB104 20543 LNS 34020 b1    The Secretary of State may, however, issue to a person not 2previously licensed as a driver in Illinois a driver's license 3which will expire not less than 4 years nor more than 5 years 4from date of issuance, except as provided elsewhere in this 5Section.6    (a-3) Beginning no later than July 1, 2028 2027, the 7Secretary shall offer to qualified applicants the option to be 8issued an 8-year driver's license. The Secretary shall submit 9proposed rules to implement this subsection to the Joint 10Committee on Administrative Rules no later than January 1, 112028 2027. 12    (a-5) Every driver's license issued under this Code to an 13applicant who is not a United States citizen or permanent 14resident, or an individual who has an approved application for 15asylum in the United States or has entered the United States in 16refugee status, shall expire on whichever is the earlier date 17of the following:18        (1) as provided under subsection (a), (f), (g), or (i) 19    of this Section;20        (2) on the date the applicant's authorized stay in the 21    United States terminates; or 22        (3) if the applicant's authorized stay is indefinite 23    and the applicant is applying for a Limited Term REAL ID 24    compliant driver's license, one year from the date of 25    issuance of the license.26    (a-10) Every REAL ID compliant driver's license issued   HB4843 Enrolled- 27 -LRB104 20543 LNS 34020 b1under this Code to an applicant who is not a United States 2citizen or permanent resident, or an individual who has an 3approved application for asylum in the United States or has 4entered the United States in refugee status, shall be marked 5"Limited Term". 6    (b) Before the expiration of a driver's license, except 7those licenses expiring on the individual's 21st birthday, or 83 months after the individual's 21st birthday, the holder 9thereof may apply for a renewal thereof, subject to all the 10provisions of Section 6-103, and the Secretary of State may 11require an examination of the applicant. A licensee whose 12driver's license expires on his 21st birthday, or 3 months 13after his 21st birthday, may not apply for a renewal of his 14driving privileges until he reaches the age of 21.15    (c) The Secretary of State shall, 30 days prior to the 16expiration of a driver's license, forward to each person whose 17license is to expire a notification of the expiration of said 18license which may be presented at the time of renewal of said 19license.20    There may be included with such notification information 21explaining the anatomical gift and Emergency Medical 22Information Card provisions of Section 6-110. The format and 23text of such information shall be prescribed by the Secretary.24    There shall be included with such notification, for a 25period of 4 years beginning January 1, 2000 information 26regarding the Illinois Adoption Registry and Medical   HB4843 Enrolled- 28 -LRB104 20543 LNS 34020 b1Information Exchange established in Section 18.1 of the 2Adoption Act.3    (d) The Secretary may defer the expiration of the driver's 4license of a licensee, spouse, and dependent children who are 5living with such licensee while on active duty, serving in the 6Armed Forces of the United States outside of the State of 7Illinois, and 120 days thereafter, upon such terms and 8conditions as the Secretary may prescribe.9    (d-5) The Secretary may defer the expiration of the 10driver's license of a licensee, or of a spouse or dependent 11children living with the licensee, serving as a civilian 12employee of the United States Armed Forces or the United 13States Department of Defense, outside of the State of 14Illinois, and 120 days thereafter, upon such terms and 15conditions as the Secretary may prescribe. 16    (e) The Secretary of State may decline to process a 17renewal of a driver's license of any person who has not paid 18any fee or tax due under this Code and is not paid upon 19reasonable notice and demand.20    (f) The Secretary shall provide that each original or 21renewal driver's license issued to a licensee under 21 years 22of age shall expire 3 months after the licensee's 21st 23birthday. Persons whose current driver's licenses expire on 24their 21st birthday on or after January 1, 1986 shall not renew 25their driver's license before their 21st birthday, and their 26current driver's license will be extended for an additional   HB4843 Enrolled- 29 -LRB104 20543 LNS 34020 b1term of 3 months beyond their 21st birthday. Thereafter, the 2expiration and term of the driver's license shall be governed 3by subsection (a) hereof.4    (g) The Secretary shall provide that each original or 5renewal driver's license issued to a licensee 81 years of age 6through age 86 shall expire 2 years from the date of issuance, 7or at such later date as the Secretary may by rule and 8regulation designate, not to exceed an additional 12 calendar 9months. The Secretary shall also provide that each original or 10renewal driver's license issued to a licensee 87 years of age 11or older shall expire 12 months from the date of issuance, or 12at such later date as the Secretary may by rule and regulation 13designate, not to exceed an additional 12 calendar months.14    (h) The Secretary of State shall provide that each special 15restricted driver's license issued under subsection (g) of 16Section 6-113 of this Code shall expire 12 months from the date 17of issuance. The Secretary shall adopt rules defining renewal 18requirements.19    (i) The Secretary of State shall provide that each 20driver's license issued to a person convicted of a sex offense 21as defined in Section 2 of the Sex Offender Registration Act 22shall expire 12 months from the date of issuance or at such 23date as the Secretary may by rule designate, not to exceed an 24additional 12 calendar months. The Secretary may adopt rules 25defining renewal requirements. 26(Source: P.A. 102-659, eff. 1-1-22; 103-872, eff. 1-1-25.)   HB4843 Enrolled- 30 -LRB104 20543 LNS 34020 b1    (625 ILCS 5/6-118)2    Sec. 6-118. Fees. 3    (a) The fees for licenses and permits under this Article 4are as follows:5    Original 4-year driver's license......................$306    Original 8-year driver's license issued under7        subsection (a-3) of Section 6-115.................$608    Original or renewal driver's license issued9        to 18, 19, and 20 year olds....................... $510    All driver's licenses for persons11        age 69 through age 80............................. $512    All driver's licenses for persons13        age 81 through age 86............................. $214    All driver's licenses for persons15        age 87 or older....................................$016    Renewal 4-year driver's license (except for17        applicants age 69 and older)......................$3018    Renewal 8-year driver's license issued under19        subsection (a-3) of Section 6-115 (except20        for applicants age 69 and older)..................$6021    Original instruction permit issued to22        persons (except those age 69 and older)23        who do not hold or have not previously24        held an Illinois instruction permit or25        driver's license................................. $20  HB4843 Enrolled- 31 -LRB104 20543 LNS 34020 b1    Instruction permit issued to any person2        holding an Illinois driver's license3        who wishes a change in classifications,4        other than at the time of renewal................. $55    Any instruction permit issued to a person6        age 69 and older.................................. $57    Instruction permit issued to any person,8        under age 69, not currently holding a9        valid Illinois driver's license or10        instruction permit but who has11        previously been issued either document12        in Illinois...................................... $1013    Restricted driving permit............................. $814    Monitoring device driving permit..................... $8 15    Duplicate or corrected driver's license16        or permit......................................... $517    Duplicate or corrected restricted18        driving permit.................................... $519    Duplicate or corrected monitoring20        device driving permit............................. $521    Duplicate driver's license or permit issued to22        an active-duty member of the23        United States Armed Forces,24        the member's spouse, or25        the dependent children living26        with the member.................................. $0   HB4843 Enrolled- 32 -LRB104 20543 LNS 34020 b1    Original or renewal M or L endorsement................ $52SPECIAL FEES FOR COMMERCIAL DRIVER'S LICENSE3        The fees for commercial driver licenses and permits 4    under Article V shall be as follows:5    Commercial driver's license:6        $6 for the CDLIS/AAMVAnet/NMVTIS Trust Fund; 7        $20 for the Motor Carrier Safety Inspection Fund;8        $10 for the driver's license;9        and $24 for the CDL:............................. $6010    Renewal commercial driver's license:11        $6 for the CDLIS/AAMVAnet/NMVTIS Trust Fund;12        $20 for the Motor Carrier Safety Inspection Fund;13        $10 for the driver's license; and14        $24 for the CDL:................................. $6015    Commercial learner's permit16        issued to any person holding a valid17        Illinois driver's license for the18        purpose of changing to a19        CDL classification: 20        $6 for the CDLIS/AAMVAnet/NMVTIS Trust Fund;21        $20 for the Motor Carrier Safety Inspection Fund; and22        $24 for the CDL classification................... $5023    Commercial learner's permit24        issued to any person holding a valid25        Illinois CDL for the purpose of26        making a change in a classification,  HB4843 Enrolled- 33 -LRB104 20543 LNS 34020 b1        endorsement or restriction........................ $52    CDL duplicate or corrected license.................... $53    In order to ensure the proper implementation of the 4Uniform Commercial Driver License Act, Article V of this 5Chapter, the Secretary of State is empowered to prorate the 6$24 fee for the commercial driver's license proportionate to 7the expiration date of the applicant's Illinois driver's 8license.9    The fee for any duplicate license or permit shall be 10waived for any person who presents the Secretary of State's 11office with a police report showing that his license or permit 12was stolen.13    The fee for any duplicate license or permit shall be 14waived for any person age 60 or older whose driver's license or 15permit has been lost or stolen. 16    No additional fee shall be charged for a driver's license, 17or for a commercial driver's license, when issued to the 18holder of an instruction permit for the same classification or 19type of license who becomes eligible for such license.20    The fee for a restricted driving permit under this 21subsection (a) shall be imposed annually until the expiration 22of the permit.23    (a-5) The fee for a driver's record or data contained 24therein is $20 and shall be disbursed as set forth in 25subsection (k) of Section 2-123 of this Code.26    (b) Any person whose license or privilege to operate a   HB4843 Enrolled- 34 -LRB104 20543 LNS 34020 b1motor vehicle in this State has been suspended or revoked 2under Section 3-707, any provision of Chapter 6, Chapter 11, 3or Section 7-205, 7-303, or 7-702 of the Illinois Safety and 4Family Financial Responsibility Law of this Code, shall in 5addition to any other fees required by this Code, pay a 6reinstatement fee as follows:7    Suspension under Section 3-707..................... $100 8    Suspension under Section 11-1431....................$100 9    Summary suspension under Section 11-501.1...........$250 10    Suspension under Section 11-501.9...................$250 11    Summary revocation under Section 11-501.1............$50012    Other suspension......................................$7013    Revocation...........................................$50014    However, any person whose license or privilege to operate 15a motor vehicle in this State has been suspended or revoked for 16a second or subsequent time for a violation of Section 11-501, 1711-501.1, or 11-501.9 of this Code or a similar provision of a 18local ordinance or a similar out-of-state offense or Section 199-3 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012 20and each suspension or revocation was for a violation of 21Section 11-501, 11-501.1, or 11-501.9 of this Code or a 22similar provision of a local ordinance or a similar 23out-of-state offense or Section 9-3 of the Criminal Code of 241961 or the Criminal Code of 2012 shall pay, in addition to any 25other fees required by this Code, a reinstatement fee as 26follows:  HB4843 Enrolled- 35 -LRB104 20543 LNS 34020 b1    Summary suspension under Section 11-501.1............$5002    Suspension under Section 11-501.9...................$500 3    Summary revocation under Section 11-501.1............$5004    Revocation...........................................$5005    (c) All fees collected under the provisions of this 6Chapter 6 shall be disbursed under subsection (g) of Section 72-119 of this Code, except as follows:8        1. The following amounts shall be paid into the 9    Drivers Education Fund:10            (A) $16 of the $20 fee for an original driver's 11        instruction permit;12            (B) one-sixth of the fee for an original driver's 13        license;14            (C) one-sixth of the fee for a renewal driver's 15        license; 16            (D) $4 of the $8 fee for a restricted driving 17        permit; and18            (E) $4 of the $8 fee for a monitoring device 19        driving permit. 20        2. $30 of the $250 fee for reinstatement of a license 21    summarily suspended under Section 11-501.1 or suspended 22    under Section 11-501.9 shall be deposited into the Drunk 23    and Drugged Driving Prevention Fund. However, for a person 24    whose license or privilege to operate a motor vehicle in 25    this State has been suspended or revoked for a second or 26    subsequent time for a violation of Section 11-501,   HB4843 Enrolled- 36 -LRB104 20543 LNS 34020 b1    11-501.1, or 11-501.9 of this Code or Section 9-3 of the 2    Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, $190 of 3    the $500 fee for reinstatement of a license summarily 4    suspended under Section 11-501.1 or suspended under 5    Section 11-501.9, and $190 of the $500 fee for 6    reinstatement of a revoked license shall be deposited into 7    the Drunk and Drugged Driving Prevention Fund. $190 of the 8    $500 fee for reinstatement of a license summarily revoked 9    pursuant to Section 11-501.1 shall be deposited into the 10    Drunk and Drugged Driving Prevention Fund.11        3. $6 of the original or renewal fee for a commercial 12    driver's license and $6 of the commercial learner's permit 13    fee when the permit is issued to any person holding a valid 14    Illinois driver's license, shall be paid into the 15    CDLIS/AAMVAnet/NMVTIS Trust Fund.16        4. $30 of the $70 fee for reinstatement of a license 17    suspended under the Illinois Safety and Family Financial 18    Responsibility Law shall be paid into the Family 19    Responsibility Fund.20        5. The $5 fee for each original or renewal M or L 21    endorsement shall be deposited into the Cycle Rider Safety 22    Training Fund.23        6. $20 of any original or renewal fee for a commercial 24    driver's license or commercial learner's permit shall be 25    paid into the Motor Carrier Safety Inspection Fund.26        7. The following amounts shall be paid into the   HB4843 Enrolled- 37 -LRB104 20543 LNS 34020 b1    General Revenue Fund:2            (A) $190 of the $250 reinstatement fee for a 3        summary suspension under Section 11-501.1 or a 4        suspension under Section 11-501.9;5            (B) $40 of the $70 reinstatement fee for any other 6        suspension provided in subsection (b) of this Section; 7        and8            (C) $440 of the $500 reinstatement fee for a first 9        offense revocation and $310 of the $500 reinstatement 10        fee for a second or subsequent revocation.11        8. Fees collected under paragraph (4) of subsection 12    (d) and subsection (h) of Section 6-205 of this Code; 13    subparagraph (C) of paragraph 3 of subsection (c) of 14    Section 6-206 of this Code; and paragraph (4) of 15    subsection (a) of Section 6-206.1 of this Code, shall be 16    paid into the funds set forth in those Sections. 17    (d) All of the proceeds of the additional fees imposed by 18Public Act 96-34 shall be deposited into the Capital Projects 19Fund. 20    (e) The additional fees imposed by Public Act 96-38 shall 21become effective 90 days after becoming law. The additional 22fees imposed by Public Act 103-8 shall become effective July 231, 2023 and shall be paid into the Secretary of State Special 24Services Fund. 25    (f) As used in this Section, "active-duty member of the 26United States Armed Forces" means a member of the Armed   HB4843 Enrolled- 38 -LRB104 20543 LNS 34020 b1Services or Reserve Forces of the United States or a member of 2the Illinois National Guard who is called to active duty 3pursuant to an executive order of the President of the United 4States, an act of the Congress of the United States, or an 5order of the Governor. 6(Source: P.A. 103-8, eff. 7-1-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 7103-872, eff. 1-1-25; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25; 104-435, eff. 811-21-25.) 9    (625 ILCS 5/11-1301.2)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 11-1301.2)10    Sec. 11-1301.2. Special decals for parking; persons with 11disabilities. 12    (a) The Secretary of State shall provide for, by 13administrative rules, the design, size, color, and placement 14of a person with disabilities motorist decal or device and 15shall provide for, by administrative rules, the content and 16form of an application for a person with disabilities motorist 17decal or device, which shall be used by local authorities in 18the issuance thereof to a person with temporary disabilities, 19provided that the decal or device is valid for no more than 90 20days, subject to renewal for like periods based upon continued 21disability, and further provided that the decal or device 22clearly sets forth the date that the decal or device expires. 23The application shall include the requirement of an Illinois 24Identification Card number or a State of Illinois driver's 25license number or, if the applicant does not have an   HB4843 Enrolled- 39 -LRB104 20543 LNS 34020 b1identification card or driver's license number, then the 2applicant may use a valid identification number issued by a 3branch of the U.S. military or a federally issued Medicare or 4Medicaid identification number. This decal or device may be 5used by the authorized holder to designate and identify a 6vehicle not owned or displaying a registration plate or 7digital registration plate as provided in Sections 3-609 and 83-616 of this Act to designate when the vehicle is being used 9to transport said person or persons with disabilities, and 10thus is entitled to enjoy all the privileges that would be 11afforded a person with disabilities licensed vehicle. Person 12with disabilities decals or devices issued and displayed 13pursuant to this Section shall be recognized and honored by 14all local authorities regardless of which local authority 15issued such decal or device.16    The decal or device shall be issued only upon a showing by 17adequate documentation that the person for whose benefit the 18decal or device is to be used has a disability as defined in 19Section 1-159.1 of this Code and the disability is temporary.20    (a-5) The Secretary may provide a disabilities motorist 21decal or device to an expectant mother during her third 22trimester. An application under this subsection is subject to 23application requirements under subsection (a). The decal or 24device shall be valid for no more than 90 days, and shall 25clearly set forth the date that the decal or device expires. 26The decal or device shall be issued only upon a showing by   HB4843 Enrolled- 40 -LRB104 20543 LNS 34020 b1adequate documentation that the expectant mother has entered 2her third trimester. 3    (b) The local governing authorities shall be responsible 4for the provision of such decal or device, its issuance and 5designated placement within the vehicle. The cost of such 6decal or device shall be at the discretion of such local 7governing authority.8    (c) The Secretary of State may, pursuant to Section 93-616(c), issue a person with disabilities parking decal or 10device to a person with disabilities as defined by Section 111-159.1. Any person with disabilities parking decal or device 12issued by the Secretary of State shall be registered to that 13person with disabilities in the form to be prescribed by the 14Secretary of State. The person with disabilities parking decal 15or device shall not display that person's address. One 16additional decal or device may be issued to an applicant upon 17his or her written request and with the approval of the 18Secretary of State. The written request must include a 19justification of the need for the additional decal or device.20    (c-5) Beginning January 1, 2014, the Secretary shall 21provide by administrative rule for the issuance of a separate 22and distinct parking decal or device for persons with 23disabilities as defined by Section 1-159.1 of this Code and 24who meet the qualifications under this subsection. The 25authorized holder of a decal or device issued under this 26subsection (c-5) shall be exempt from the payment of fees   HB4843 Enrolled- 41 -LRB104 20543 LNS 34020 b1generated by parking in a metered space, a parking area 2subject to paragraph (10) of subsection (a) of Section 11-209 3of this Code, or a publicly owned parking area.4    The Secretary shall issue a meter-exempt decal or device 5to a person with disabilities who: (i) has been issued 6registration plates or digital registration plates under 7subsection (a) of Section 3-609 or Section 3-616 of this Code 8or a special decal or device under this Section, (ii) holds a 9valid Illinois driver's license, and (iii) is unable to do one 10or more of the following:11        (1) manage, manipulate, or insert coins, or obtain 12    tickets or tokens in parking meters or ticket machines in 13    parking lots, due to the lack of fine motor control of both 14    hands;15        (2) reach above his or her head to a height of 42 16    inches from the ground, due to a lack of finger, hand, or 17    upper extremity strength or mobility;18        (3) approach a parking meter due to his or her use of a 19    wheelchair or other device for mobility; or20        (4) walk more than 20 feet due to an orthopedic, 21    neurological, cardiovascular, or lung condition in which 22    the degree of debilitation is so severe that it almost 23    completely impedes the ability to walk.24    The application for a meter-exempt parking decal or device 25shall contain a statement certified by a licensed physician, 26physician assistant, or advanced practice registered nurse   HB4843 Enrolled- 42 -LRB104 20543 LNS 34020 b1attesting to the permanent nature of the applicant's condition 2and verifying that the applicant meets the physical 3qualifications specified in this subsection (c-5).4    Notwithstanding the requirements of this subsection (c-5), 5the Secretary shall issue a meter-exempt decal or device to a 6person who has been issued registration plates or digital 7registration plates under Section 3-616 of this Code or a 8special decal or device under this Section, if the applicant 9is: (i) the parent of a person with disabilities who is under 1018 years of age and incapable of driving; or (ii) the legal 11guardian of a person with disabilities who is under 18 years of 12age and incapable of driving.13    (d) Replacement decals or devices may be issued for lost, 14stolen, or destroyed decals upon application and payment of a 15$10 fee. The replacement fee may be waived for individuals 16that have claimed and received a grant under the Senior 17Citizens and Persons with Disabilities Property Tax Relief 18Act.19    (e) A person classified as a veteran under subsection (e) 20of Section 6-106 of this Code that has been issued a decal or 21device under this Section shall not be required to submit 22evidence of disability in order to renew that decal or device 23if, at the time of initial application, he or she submitted 24evidence from his or her physician or the Department of 25Veterans Affairs that the disability is of a permanent nature. 26However, the Secretary shall take reasonable steps to ensure   HB4843 Enrolled- 43 -LRB104 20543 LNS 34020 b1the veteran still resides in this State at the time of the 2renewal. These steps may include requiring the veteran to 3provide additional documentation or to appear at a Secretary 4of State facility. To identify veterans who are eligible for 5this exemption, the Secretary shall compare the list of the 6persons who have been issued a decal or device to the list of 7persons who have been issued a vehicle registration plate or 8digital registration plate for veterans with disabilities 9under Section 3-609 of this Code, or who are identified as a 10veteran on their driver's license under Section 6-110 of this 11Code or on their identification card under Section 4 of the 12Illinois Identification Card Act. 13(Source: P.A. 104-234, eff. 8-15-25.) 14    (625 ILCS 5/12-610.2)15    Sec. 12-610.2. Electronic communication devices.16    (a) As used in this Section:17    "Electronic communication device" means an electronic 18device, including, but not limited to, a hand-held wireless 19telephone, hand-held personal digital assistant, tablet, or a 20portable or mobile computer, or artificial intelligence smart 21glasses, but does not include a global positioning system or 22navigation system or a device that is physically or 23electronically integrated into the motor vehicle.24    (b) A person may not operate a motor vehicle on a roadway 25while using an electronic communication device, including   HB4843 Enrolled- 44 -LRB104 20543 LNS 34020 b1using an electronic communication device to watch or stream 2video, participate in any video conferencing application, 3including, but not limited to, Zoom, Microsoft Teams, or 4WebEx, or access any social media site, including, but not 5limited to, Facebook, Snapchat, Instagram, or X Twitter. The 6exemptions in paragraphs (3) and (9) of subsection (d) do not 7apply when a person is using the electronic communication 8device to watch or stream video, participate in any video 9conferencing application, or access any social media site.10    (b-5) A person commits aggravated use of an electronic 11communication device when he or she violates subsection (b) 12and in committing the violation he or she is involved in a 13motor vehicle crash that results in great bodily harm, 14permanent disability, disfigurement, or death to another and 15the violation is a proximate cause of the injury or death. 16    (c) A violation of this Section is an offense against 17traffic regulations governing the movement of vehicles. A 18person who violates this Section shall be fined a maximum of 19$75 for a first offense, $100 for a second offense, $125 for a 20third offense, and $150 for a fourth or subsequent offense, 21except that a person who violates subsection (b-5) shall be 22assessed a minimum fine of $1,000. 23    (d) This Section does not apply to:24        (1) a law enforcement officer or operator of an 25    emergency vehicle while performing his or her official 26    duties;  HB4843 Enrolled- 45 -LRB104 20543 LNS 34020 b1        (1.5) a first responder, including a volunteer first 2    responder, while operating his or her own personal motor 3    vehicle using an electronic communication device for the 4    sole purpose of receiving information about an emergency 5    situation while en route to performing his or her official 6    duties; 7        (2) a driver using an electronic communication device 8    for the sole purpose of reporting an emergency situation 9    and continued communication with emergency personnel 10    during the emergency situation;11        (3) a driver using an electronic communication device, 12    except for artificial intelligence smart glasses, in 13    hands-free or voice-operated mode, which may include the 14    use of a headset;15        (4) a driver of a commercial motor vehicle reading a 16    message displayed on a permanently installed communication 17    device designed for a commercial motor vehicle with a 18    screen that does not exceed 10 inches tall by 10 inches 19    wide in size; 20        (5) a driver using an electronic communication device 21    while parked on the shoulder of a roadway;22        (6) a driver using an electronic communication device, 23    except for artificial intelligence smart glasses, when the 24    vehicle is stopped due to normal traffic being obstructed 25    and the driver has the motor vehicle transmission in 26    neutral or park;  HB4843 Enrolled- 46 -LRB104 20543 LNS 34020 b1        (7) a driver using two-way or citizens band radio 2    services; 3        (8) a driver using two-way mobile radio transmitters 4    or receivers for licensees of the Federal Communications 5    Commission in the amateur radio service; 6        (9) a driver using an electronic communication device 7    by pressing a single button to initiate or terminate a 8    voice communication; or 9        (10) a driver using an electronic communication device 10    capable of performing multiple functions, other than a 11    hand-held wireless telephone or hand-held personal digital 12    assistant (for example, a fleet management system, 13    dispatching device, citizens band radio, or music player) 14    for a purpose that is not otherwise prohibited by this 15    Section. 16    (e) A person convicted of violating subsection (b-5) 17commits a Class A misdemeanor if the violation resulted in 18great bodily harm, permanent disability, or disfigurement to 19another. A person convicted of violating subsection (b-5) 20commits a Class 4 felony if the violation resulted in the death 21of another person. 22(Source: P.A. 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 102-982, eff. 7-1-23; 23103-310, eff. 1-1-24.) 24    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 25becoming law.